static/hunspell/15.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX O28 Y 166 # N08 аф.принадлеж.+
SFX O28 0 ҙөң .	+Gen
SFX O28 0 гә .	+Dat
SFX O28 0 ҙө .	+Acc
SFX O28 0 ҙән .	+Abl
SFX O28 0 ҙә .	+Loc
SFX O28 0 ҙөңмө .	+Gen+Q
SFX O28 0 гәме .	+Dat+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөмө .	+Acc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәнме .	+Abl+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәме .	+Loc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөңмөлөр .	+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 гәмелер .	+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөмөлөр .	+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәнмелер .	+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәмелер .	+Loc+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөңдөр .	+Gen+Indf
SFX O28 0 гәлер .	+Dat+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөлөр .	+Acc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәндер .	+Abl+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәлер .	+Loc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөңсө .	+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 гәсе .	+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙөсө .	+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәнсе .	+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәсе .	+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 мө .	+Q
SFX O28 0 мөлөр .	+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөр .	+Indf
SFX O28 0 сө .	+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙөкө .	+Poss
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнөң .	+Poss+Gen
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнә .	+Poss+Dat
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөн .	+Poss+Acc
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнән .	+Poss+Abl
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөндә .	+Poss+Loc
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнөңмө .	+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнәме .	+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнмө .	+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнәнме .	+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөндәме .	+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнөңдөр .	+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнәлер .	+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөндөр .	+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнәндер .	+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөндәлер .	+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнөңсө .	+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнәсе .	+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнсө .	+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөнәнсе .	+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөндәсе .	+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөмө .	+Poss+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөлөр .	+Poss+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙөкөсө .	+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәй .	+Der/дай
SFX O28 0 сә .	+Der/са
SFX O28 0 ҙәйме .	+Der/дай+Q
SFX O28 0 сәме .	+Der/са+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәймелер .	+Der/дай+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 сәмелер .	+Der/са+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙер .	+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O28 0 сәлер .	+Der/са+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәйсе .	+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 сәсе .	+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙәр .	+Der/дай+Pl
SFX O28 0 сәләр .	+Der/са+Pl
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙәрҙең .	+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙәргә .	+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙәрҙе .	+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙәрҙән .	+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙәрҙә .	+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O28 0 сәләрҙең .	+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O28 0 сәләргә .	+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O28 0 сәләрҙе .	+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O28 0 сәләрҙән .	+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O28 0 сәләрҙә .	+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙең .	+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O28 0 ҙәйгә .	+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙе .	+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙән .	+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O28 0 ҙәйҙә .	+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O28 0 сәнең .	+Der/са+Gen
SFX O28 0 сәгә .	+Der/са+Dat
SFX O28 0 сәне .	+Der/са+Acc
SFX O28 0 сәнән .	+Der/са+Abl
SFX O28 0 сәлә .	+Der/са+Loc
SFX O28 0 ҙәге .	+Der/дағы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләр .	+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙең .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләргә .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙән .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙә .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙеңме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләргәме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙеме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙәнме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙәме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙеңдер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләргәлер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙелер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙәндер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙәлер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙеңсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләргәсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙесе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙәнсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙәсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрем .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрең .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләре .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләребеҙ .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрегеҙ .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләремме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләреңме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләреме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләребеҙме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрегеҙме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләремдер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләреңдер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрелер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләребеҙҙер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрегеҙҙер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләремсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләреңсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләресе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләребеҙсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрегеҙсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрҙер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләрсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенең .	+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O28 0 ҙәгегә .	+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O28 0 ҙәгене .	+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенән .	+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O28 0 ҙәгелә .	+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенеңме .	+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгегәме .	+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенеме .	+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенәнме .	+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләме .	+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенеңдер .	+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгегәлер .	+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенелер .	+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенәндер .	+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләлер .	+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенеңсе .	+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгегәсе .	+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенесе .	+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгенәнсе .	+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләсе .	+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеме .	+Der/дағы+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгемелер .	+Der/дағы+Q+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгелер .	+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгесе .	+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләй .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX O28 0 ҙәгесә .	+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләйме .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгесәме .	+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләйҙер .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгесәлер .	+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX O28 0 ҙәгеләйсе .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 ҙәгесәсе .	+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O28 0 гәсә .	+Der/ҡаса
SFX O28 0 гәсәме .	+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX O28 0 гәсәлер .	+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX O28 0 гәсәсе .	+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
